Hawaii statutes.
§321-11.2 Adult foster homes. (a) The
department of health is authorized to certify adult foster homes for
individuals with developmental or intellectual disabilities requiring care
beyond the individual's eighteenth birthday. "Adult foster home"
means a private family home providing care on a twenty-four hour basis to
adults with developmental or intellectual disabilities. To be certified, an
adult foster home shall house not more than two adults with developmental or
intellectual disabilities who are unrelated to the certified caregiver at the
same time. The director of health may waive the two-adult limit for
certification of that home as an adult foster home; provided that the total
number of adults with developmental or intellectual disabilities in the home
shall not exceed three adults with developmental or intellectual disabilities
who are related or unrelated to the certified caregiver.

For the purposes of this subsection:

"Certified caregiver" means an
individual who is twenty-one years of age or older, resides in an adult foster
home, and has been issued by the department a valid certificate of approval to
provide care, training, and supervision on a twenty-four hour basis to adults
with developmental or intellectual disabilities.

"Related" means connected by legal
guardianship, trusteeship, blood, marriage, or a legal relationship between the
certified caregiver and the adult with developmental or intellectual
disabilities.

(b) To accommodate residents of a foster
boarding home for children with developmental or intellectual disabilities who
reach the age of eighteen years, where the home is certified as a foster
boarding home for children under section 346-17, the director of health may
waive the two-adult limit for certification of that home as an adult foster
home; provided that:

(1) The total number of foster children with
developmental or intellectual disabilities and adults with developmental or
intellectual disabilities in such a dually certified home shall not exceed
three; and

(2) No new adults may be admitted into the home while
there are any foster children residing in the home.

This subsection shall not affect the validity
of the certification of any adult foster home that is certified as a foster
boarding home under section 346-17 and in existence as of July 2, 2014.

(c) An existing adult foster home shall not be
given dual certification if the certification as an adult foster home precedes
dual certification, unless the certification as a foster boarding home under
section 346-17 is for a specific child, as provided in the department of human
services' administrative rules.

(d) The rules of the department of human
services adopted under authority of section 346-17, which prescribe the
standards of conditions and competence of operation of child foster boarding
homes shall apply to adult foster homes. Notwithstanding chapter 91, to the
contrary, the rules shall be considered adopted by the department of health on
July 1, 1986, for the purpose of regulating adult foster care homes and shall
be valid until the department of health adopts rules pursuant to chapter 91.
The department of health shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for
the purposes of this section.

(e) Rate of payment for adult foster homes is
to be determined on the same basis as domiciliary care homes as provided under
section 346-53. [L 1986, c 328, §§2, 3, and 7; am L 1987, c 334, §§2, 3, and 5;
am L 1988, c 141, §24; am L 1992, c 15, §2; am L 2013, c 212, §3; am L 2014, c
203, §1]

Note

"Foster boarding home" in §346-17 referred to in subsections (b) to (d) changed to
"resource family home" by L 2016, c 133, §3.

Revision Note

In subsection
(b), "July 2, 2014" substituted for "the effective date of Act [203], Session Laws of Hawaii 2014". The approval
date for Act 203 was July 2, 2014.

Cross References

Criminal history
record checks, see §333F-22.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next